District of Columbia statutes.
23-103a

Repealed

Rights of victims of crime.

Repealed.

May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-229, § 2(b), 35 DCR 6155
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, §§ 101(f), 501, 41 DCR 2608
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 303, 47 DCR 7039
1981 Ed., § 23-103a.
For temporary amendment of section, see §§ 101(f) and 501 of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).